Maine, session 132, LD1491.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶O, as amended by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §2, is
further amended to read:
O. Establish a system to audit financial requests and payments that includes the
authority to recoup payments when necessary. The commission may summon persons
and subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, require production of evidence,
administer oaths and examine any person under oath as part of an audit. Any summons
or subpoena may be served by registered mail with return receipt. Subpoenas issued
under this paragraph may be enforced by the Superior Court; and
Sec. 2. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶P, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
P. Develop and maintain a registry of names, telephone numbers and other contact
information for attorneys who provide legal services to persons who are incarcerated.
The commission shall on a weekly basis provide these names, telephone numbers and
other contact information to all sheriffs' offices and to the Department of Corrections.
On the Monday following transmission of the information, the sheriffs' offices and the
Department of Corrections have constructive notice that communications to and from
these attorneys by residents of jails and correctional facilities are subject to the
attorney-client privilege. The attorneys' names, telephone numbers and other contact
information are confidential.; and
Sec. 3. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶Q is enacted to read:
Q. Identify those areas of the State that are underserved by attorneys.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5219-CCC is enacted to read:
§5219-CCC. Legal services credit
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Commission" means the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services
established in Title 4, section 1801.
B. "Eligible attorney" means a person admitted to practice law as an attorney pursuant
to Title 4, section 805-A who, after January 1, 2026:
(1) First begins practicing law in the State by joining an existing law practice in
an underserved area or establishing a new law practice or purchasing an existing
law practice in an underserved area; and
(2) Agrees to practice law full time for at least 5 years in an underserved area.
C. "Underserved area" means an area of the State that is identified as a legal services
shortage area by the commission pursuant to Title 4, section 1804, subsection 3,
paragraph Q.
2. Credit. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an eligible attorney is
allowed a credit for each taxable year, not to exceed $18,000, against the taxes due under
this Part. The credit may be claimed in the first year that the eligible attorney meets the
Page 1 - 132LR2025(01)

411 conditions of eligibility for at least 6 months and in each of the 4 subsequent years. The
422 credit is not refundable.
3. Review. By January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the commission shall submit
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over judiciary matters
a report that analyzes the effectiveness of the credit provided by this section in attracting
attorneys to underserved areas and recommending whether the credit should be retained,
repealed or amended. The committee may report out legislation related to the report to the
Legislature during the session to which the report was submitted.
4. Rules. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.